Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,222
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of section 60-6,219 or 60-6,221 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. In the event of such conviction, as a part of the judgment of conviction, the trial judge shall direct the person to produce in court or submit to the prosecuting attorney, before such person again operates the motor vehicle upon a highway, satisfactory proof showing that the light equipment involved in such person's conviction has been made to conform with the requirements of such sections. The failure, refusal, or neglect of such convicted person to abide by such direction in the judgment of conviction shall be deemed an additional offense for which such person shall be prosecuted.

Laws 1939, c. 78, § 9, p. 322;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-11,120;

R.S.1943, § 39-7,126;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-669.21;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 318.

Auxiliary driving lights are defined by section 60-6,225(2), and under that subsection, if they do not meet the criteria for headlights set forth in section 60-6,221, it is a Class III misdemeanor under this section. State v. Carnicle, 18 Neb. App. 761, 792 N.W.2d 893 (2010).